Utah statutes.
9-9-107.   Annual report.

The division shall submit an annual report of its operations and recommendations to:

(1)  the department;

(2)  the governor; and

(3)  the Native American Legislative Liaison Committee created in Section 36-22-1.



Amended by Chapter 35, 1997 General Session

